Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1732
Director; adopt rules and regulations; standards.

(1) In addition to specific authority granted elsewhere in the Commodity Code, the director may adopt and promulgate rules, regulations, and orders as are necessary to carry out the code. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, rules and regulations defining any terms, whether or not used in the code, insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with the code. For the purpose of rules and regulations, the director may classify commodities and commodity contracts, persons, and matters within the director's jurisdiction.

(2) Unless specifically provided in the Commodity Code, no rule, regulation, or order may be adopted and promulgated unless the director finds that the action is:

(a) Necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors; and

(b) Consistent with the purposes fairly intended by the policy and provisions of the code.

(3) All rules and regulations of the director shall be published.

(4) No provision of the Commodity Code imposing any liability shall apply to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with a rule, regulation, or order adopted and promulgated by the director, notwithstanding that the rule, regulation, or order may later be amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 32.